ug.aff
FLAG num
SFX 7772 N 1
SFX 7772 0 رىغاندەك .

SFX 7773 N 1
SFX 7773 0 لىساڭ .

SFX 7774 N 1
SFX 7774 0 ەكلىرىگە .

SFX 7775 N 1
SFX 7775 0 ونىڭ .

SFX 7776 N 1
SFX 7776 0 قايناق .

SFX 7777 N 1
SFX 7777 0 ېلا .

SFX 7778 N 1
SFX 7778 0 ۇنى .

SFX 7779 N 1
SFX 7779 0 چىلىكلەر .

SFX 7780 N 1
SFX 7780 0 ەتچىلىكتە .

SFX 7781 N 1
SFX 7781 0 رۇس .

SFX 7782 N 1
SFX 7782 0 مەس .

SFX 7783 N 1
SFX 7783 0 ھەي .

SFX 7784 N 1
SFX 7784 0 ەتمەسلىكى .

SFX 7785 N 1
SFX 7785 0 ايدىن .

SFX 7786 N 1
SFX 7786 0 انلىقىڭىز .

SFX 7787 N 1
SFX 7787 0 دىكىنىڭ .

SFX 7788 N 1
SFX 7788 0 تكەنلىكى .

SFX 7789 N 1
SFX 7789 0 جىغا .

SFX 7790 N 1
SFX 7790 0 تسىيەسى .

SFX 7791 N 1
SFX 7791 0 قلانماق .

SFX 7792 N 1
SFX 7792 0 رچۇ .

SFX 7793 N 1
SFX 7793 0 تتۇقمۇ .

SFX 7794 N 1
SFX 7794 0 ز .

SFX 7795 N 1
SFX 7795 0 ۇرۇلدى .

SFX 7796 N 1
SFX 7796 0 تۇلماق .

SFX 7797 N 1
SFX 7797 0 ساللا .

SFX 7798 N 1
SFX 7798 0 بالا .

SFX 7799 N 1
SFX 7799 0 دەشكە .

SFX 7800 N 1
SFX 7800 0 رغۇچى .

SFX 7801 N 1
SFX 7801 0 ىكىسىنى .

SFX 7802 N 1
SFX 7802 0 ېرمىدا .

SFX 7803 N 1
SFX 7803 0 اقلىنىش .

SFX 7804 N 1
SFX 7804 0 تۈرىدىكەن .

SFX 7805 N 1
SFX 7805 0 ئولىت .

SFX 7806 N 1
SFX 7806 0 دىچۇ .

SFX 7807 N 1
SFX 7807 0 ېلكا .

SFX 7808 N 1
SFX 7808 0 ۈۋاپتۇ .

SFX 7809 N 1
SFX 7809 0 يارلىقلار .

SFX 7810 N 1
SFX 7810 0 ىرىڭىزدىن .

SFX 7811 N 1
SFX 7811 0 زىيا .

SFX 7812 N 1
SFX 7812 0 توزا .

SFX 7813 N 1
SFX 7813 0 پىگە .

SFX 7814 N 1
SFX 7814 0 كچىسى .

SFX 7815 N 1
SFX 7815 0 ۇرالماي .

SFX 7816 N 1
SFX 7816 0 رگەن .

SFX 7817 N 1
SFX 7817 0 يلىقتىن .

SFX 7818 N 1
SFX 7818 0 ىكىمىزدە .

SFX 7819 N 1
SFX 7819 0 ۋاتقانلىقى .

SFX 7820 N 1
SFX 7820 0 ياقلىق .

SFX 7821 N 1
SFX 7821 0 اشلارغا .

SFX 7822 N 1
SFX 7822 0 ملىرىگە .

SFX 7823 N 1
SFX 7823 0 غانلىقنىڭ .

SFX 7824 N 1
SFX 7824 0 ىڭدە .

SFX 7825 N 1
SFX 7825 0 ەلنى .

SFX 7826 N 1
SFX 7826 0 ۇرلارنى .

SFX 7827 N 1
SFX 7827 0 اشقاندىن .

SFX 7828 N 1
SFX 7828 0 نغانلىرىنى .

SFX 7829 N 1
SFX 7829 0 ۇرۇشماق .

SFX 7830 N 1
SFX 7830 0 -قولۇم .

SFX 7831 N 1
SFX 7831 0 ەتمەكچى .

SFX 7832 N 1
SFX 7832 0 ۋازلىقنىڭ .

SFX 7833 N 1
SFX 7833 0 لتان .

SFX 7834 N 1
SFX 7834 0 لاشسا .

SFX 7835 N 1
SFX 7835 0 وي .

SFX 7836 N 1
SFX 7836 0 وكۇنى .

SFX 7837 N 1
SFX 7837 0 اڭمۇ .

SFX 7838 N 1
SFX 7838 0 كتىكا .

SFX 7839 N 1
SFX 7839 0 ۈرى .

SFX 7840 N 1
SFX 7840 0 لىقىڭىز .

SFX 7841 N 1
SFX 7841 0 ۇرىمەن .

SFX 7842 N 1
SFX 7842 0 ڭزىنىڭ .

SFX 7843 N 1
SFX 7843 0 داڭغا .

SFX 7844 N 1
SFX 7844 0 ۋىرنىڭ .

SFX 7845 N 1
SFX 7845 0 ىۋالىمىز .

SFX 7846 N 1
SFX 7846 0 ىماپتۇ .

SFX 7847 N 1
SFX 7847 0 المىغاندىن .

SFX 7848 N 1
SFX 7848 0 ئىسپېكتىروسكوپىيە .

SFX 7849 N 1
SFX 7849 0 لسىڭىزلا .

SFX 7850 N 1
SFX 7850 0 ناننىڭ .

SFX 7851 N 1
SFX 7851 0 زگىل .

SFX 7852 N 1
SFX 7852 0 خىمىيەلىك .

SFX 7853 N 1
SFX 7853 0 ىلىدى .

SFX 7854 N 1
SFX 7854 0 ەنگەنلىكى .

SFX 7855 N 1
SFX 7855 0 ۇمدا .

SFX 7856 N 1
SFX 7856 0 بىگە .

SFX 7857 N 1
SFX 7857 0 پىن .

SFX 7858 N 1
SFX 7858 0 ۋىلىق .

SFX 7859 N 1
SFX 7859 0 انداق .

SFX 7860 N 1
SFX 7860 0 شەيلى .

SFX 7861 N 1
SFX 7861 0 اتقانلىقتىن .

SFX 7862 N 1
SFX 7862 0 انماقتا .

SFX 7863 N 1
SFX 7863 0 ۈشنىلا .

SFX 7864 N 1
SFX 7864 0 لدىمۇ .

SFX 7865 N 1
SFX 7865 0 ركنىڭ .

SFX 7866 N 1
SFX 7866 0 ۈۋالغان .

SFX 7867 N 1
SFX 7867 0 تىكا .

SFX 7868 N 1
SFX 7868 0 غىسى .

SFX 7869 N 1
SFX 7869 0 لىشتە .

SFX 7870 N 1
SFX 7870 0 نكىنىڭ .

SFX 7871 N 1
SFX 7871 0 يدۇر .

SFX 7872 N 1
SFX 7872 0 پولدۇرۇڭ .

SFX 7873 N 1
SFX 7873 0 لايدۇكى .

SFX 7874 N 1
SFX 7874 0 بوي .

SFX 7875 N 1
SFX 7875 0 ىنساب .

SFX 7876 N 1
SFX 7876 0 زمدا .

SFX 7877 N 1
SFX 7877 0 اشتۇرۇشى .

SFX 7878 N 1
SFX 7878 0 پسەن .

SFX 7879 N 1
SFX 7879 0 تىگىمۇ .

SFX 7880 N 1
SFX 7880 0 دەنىڭ .

SFX 7881 N 1
SFX 7881 0 مەسلىكنى .

SFX 7882 N 1
SFX 7882 0 ۇ-يوق .

SFX 7883 N 1
SFX 7883 0 لىكلەرمۇ .

SFX 7884 N 1
SFX 7884 0 لاردىكىدىن .

SFX 7885 N 1
SFX 7885 0 المايدۇ .

SFX 7886 N 1
SFX 7886 0 لدىغۇ .

SFX 7887 N 1
SFX 7887 0 ىتىشتا .

SFX 7888 N 1
SFX 7888 0 رىل .

SFX 7889 N 1
SFX 7889 0 نلىرىنىمۇ .

SFX 7890 N 1
SFX 7890 0 نىلارغا .

SFX 7891 N 1
SFX 7891 0 ىغۇسى .

SFX 7892 N 1
SFX 7892 0 ىغاچقا .

SFX 7893 N 1
SFX 7893 0 رلا .

SFX 7894 N 1
SFX 7894 0 ەگىچە .

SFX 7895 N 1
SFX 7895 0 ۇزنى .

SFX 7896 N 1
SFX 7896 0 رال .

SFX 7897 N 1
SFX 7897 0 غانلارنىڭمۇ .

SFX 7898 N 1
SFX 7898 0 نىشىنى .

SFX 7899 N 1
SFX 7899 0 نلىقىدۇر .

SFX 7900 N 1
SFX 7900 0 ۇپپاڭ .

SFX 7901 N 1
SFX 7901 0 ىراش .

SFX 7902 N 1
SFX 7902 0 مىنا .

SFX 7903 N 1
SFX 7903 0 ىلىماق .

SFX 7904 N 1
SFX 7904 0 سلىقىڭىزنى .

SFX 7905 N 1
SFX 7905 0 اتلاپ .

SFX 7906 N 1
SFX 7906 0 زىقلىق .

SFX 7907 N 1
SFX 7907 0 انىگە .

SFX 7908 N 1
SFX 7908 0 تارلىقى .

SFX 7909 N 1
SFX 7909 0 ىرىڭ .

SFX 7910 N 1
SFX 7910 0 باغقا .

SFX 7911 N 1
SFX 7911 0 سلەرنى .

SFX 7912 N 1
SFX 7912 0 يتتۇق .

SFX 7913 N 1
SFX 7913 0 رۈلۈشى .

SFX 7914 N 1
SFX 7914 0 تىۋاتقانلىقىنى .

SFX 7915 N 1
SFX 7915 0 اتلارمۇ .

SFX 7916 N 1
SFX 7916 0 لوزۇڭ .

SFX 7917 N 1
SFX 7917 0 وتىدىن .

SFX 7918 N 1
SFX 7918 0 اتقۇچى .

SFX 7919 N 1
SFX 7919 0 ماغا .

SFX 7920 N 1
SFX 7920 0 ىۋاتقانلىقىنىڭ .

SFX 7921 N 1
SFX 7921 0 لمەيدۇ .

SFX 7922 N 1
SFX 7922 0 ىنىڭلارنى .

SFX 7923 N 1
SFX 7923 0 تلىقتىن .

SFX 7924 N 1
SFX 7924 0 يەلەيدىكەن .

SFX 7925 N 1
SFX 7925 0 گۈل .

SFX 7926 N 1
SFX 7926 0 ۇب .

SFX 7927 N 1
SFX 7927 0 لغاندۇر .

SFX 7928 N 1
SFX 7928 0 ىنار .

SFX 7929 N 1
SFX 7929 0 دىرغا .

SFX 7930 N 1
SFX 7930 0 يەتچى .

SFX 7931 N 1
SFX 7931 0 ساڭلارمۇ .

SFX 7932 N 1
SFX 7932 0 اشماي .

SFX 7933 N 1
SFX 7933 0 دۇم .

SFX 7934 N 1
SFX 7934 0 لغۇز .

SFX 7935 N 1
SFX 7935 0 اھ .

SFX 7936 N 1
SFX 7936 0 زون .

SFX 7937 N 1
SFX 7937 0 اندۇرۇپ .

SFX 7938 N 1
SFX 7938 0 اتتەك .

SFX 7939 N 1
SFX 7939 0 بۇسى .

SFX 7940 N 1
SFX 7940 0 ىنىمچە .

SFX 7941 N 1
SFX 7941 0 لاردىلا .

SFX 7942 N 1
SFX 7942 0 نىزم .

SFX 7943 N 1
SFX 7943 0 تىڭلارنى .

SFX 7944 N 1
SFX 7944 0 اڭلاردىن .

SFX 7945 N 1
SFX 7945 0 ڭدۇر .

SFX 7946 N 1
SFX 7946 0 اتقانلارنىڭ .

SFX 7947 N 1
SFX 7947 0 ىلىۋاتىدۇ .

SFX 7948 N 1
SFX 7948 0 ئۈزۈمى .

SFX 7949 N 1
SFX 7949 0 ەيۋاتاتتى .

SFX 7950 N 1
SFX 7950 0 قچىمىز .

SFX 7951 N 1
SFX 7951 0 ۈشنىڭ .

SFX 7952 N 1
SFX 7952 0 ازلىققا .

SFX 7953 N 1
SFX 7953 0 ۇزلۇق .

SFX 7954 N 1
SFX 7954 0 ىنكى .

SFX 7955 N 1
SFX 7955 0 ۇللۇق .

SFX 7956 N 1
SFX 7956 0 ئاتار .

SFX 7957 N 1
SFX 7957 0 گەچكە .

SFX 7958 N 1
SFX 7958 0 ۇلۇشىغا .

SFX 7959 N 1
SFX 7959 0 ىگىلى .

SFX 7960 N 1
SFX 7960 0 نىپ .

SFX 7961 N 1
SFX 7961 0 ېساب .

SFX 7962 N 1
SFX 7962 0 ماش .

SFX 7963 N 1
SFX 7963 0 ىدىغىنىمىز .

SFX 7964 N 1
SFX 7964 0 -يۇرتقا .

SFX 7965 N 1
SFX 7965 0 ەتكەنلەر .

SFX 7966 N 1
SFX 7966 0 جەل .

SFX 7967 N 1
SFX 7967 0 ەنلىكتۇر .

SFX 7968 N 1
SFX 7968 0 پۇش .

SFX 7969 N 1
SFX 7969 0 تانىغا .

SFX 7970 N 1
SFX 7970 0 الغۇ .

SFX 7971 N 1
SFX 7971 0 نىلىرىدا .

SFX 7972 N 1
SFX 7972 0 ۈڭىز .

SFX 7973 N 1
SFX 7973 0 دالغان .

SFX 7974 N 1
SFX 7974 0 مچىدىن .

SFX 7975 N 1
SFX 7975 0 تاسىغا .

SFX 7976 N 1
SFX 7976 0 مايدىغانلىقىغا .

SFX 7977 N 1
SFX 7977 0 لىقىغا .

SFX 7978 N 1
SFX 7978 0 نىڭلىق .

SFX 7979 N 1
SFX 7979 0 تولوگىيە .

SFX 7980 N 1
SFX 7980 0 رىدۇر .

SFX 7981 N 1
SFX 7981 0 ندىي .

SFX 7982 N 1
SFX 7982 0 شىشىنى .

SFX 7983 N 1
SFX 7983 0 ۇنىڭ .

SFX 7984 N 1
SFX 7984 0 نچاقلىق .

SFX 7985 N 1
SFX 7985 0 لمايدۇ .

SFX 7986 N 1
SFX 7986 0 قلىشى .

SFX 7987 N 1
SFX 7987 0 سىنىلا .

SFX 7988 N 1
SFX 7988 0 تىشىغا .

SFX 7989 N 1
SFX 7989 0 ىزغىمۇ .

SFX 7990 N 1
SFX 7990 0 زىيولوگىيە .

SFX 7991 N 1
SFX 7991 0 لىۋىدى .

SFX 7992 N 1
SFX 7992 0 ىخاننىڭ .

SFX 7993 N 1
SFX 7993 0 غاننىمۇ .

SFX 7994 N 1
SFX 7994 0 رساق .

SFX 7995 N 1
SFX 7995 0 ىرلىك .

SFX 7996 N 1
SFX 7996 0 لەنمەيدۇ .

SFX 7997 N 1
SFX 7997 0 يېلىم .

SFX 7998 N 1
SFX 7998 0 لۇقلارنى .

SFX 7999 N 1
SFX 7999 0 ئوقەت .

SFX 8000 N 1
SFX 8000 0 دىشىمنىڭ .

SFX 8001 N 1
SFX 8001 0 اپسىز .

SFX 8002 N 1
SFX 8002 0 ىنىڭ .

SFX 8003 N 1
SFX 8003 0 ۇقىنىمۇ .

SFX 8004 N 1
SFX 8004 0 ىيىشماق .

SFX 8005 N 1
SFX 8005 0 راشتۇرماق .

SFX 8006 N 1
SFX 8006 0 كلىتىش .

SFX 8007 N 1
SFX 8007 0 نىن .

SFX 8008 N 1
SFX 8008 0 ەسىگە .

SFX 8009 N 1
SFX 8009 0 ۇرۇقتىن .

SFX 8010 N 1
SFX 8010 0 تىرگەن .

SFX 8011 N 1
SFX 8011 0 كىلەرگە .

SFX 8012 N 1
SFX 8012 0 ىڭكىدىن .

SFX 8013 N 1
SFX 8013 0 ۇرغىنى .

SFX 8014 N 1
SFX 8014 0 ەندۈردى .

SFX 8015 N 1
SFX 8015 0 ەت .

SFX 8016 N 1
SFX 8016 0 غايسەن .

SFX 8017 N 1
SFX 8017 0 اڭدا .

SFX 8018 N 1
SFX 8018 0 ەنمەك .

SFX 8019 N 1
SFX 8019 0 ئەتنىڭ .

SFX 8020 N 1
SFX 8020 0 ەندۈرۈلگەن .

SFX 8021 N 1
SFX 8021 0 لىكىنىمۇ .

SFX 8022 N 1
SFX 8022 0 غانلاردىن .

SFX 8023 N 1
SFX 8023 0 ۋوت .

SFX 8024 N 1
SFX 8024 0 ىرمۇ .

SFX 8025 N 1
SFX 8025 0 ىغىنىم .

SFX 8026 N 1
SFX 8026 0 مىمغا .

SFX 8027 N 1
SFX 8027 0 ازىنىڭ .

SFX 8028 N 1
SFX 8028 0 للىق .

SFX 8029 N 1
SFX 8029 0 رسىلا .

SFX 8030 N 1
SFX 8030 0 ىقىڭىز .

SFX 8031 N 1
SFX 8031 0 گىسىنى .

SFX 8032 N 1
SFX 8032 0 مەڭلار .

SFX 8033 N 1
SFX 8033 0 نباغلىق .

SFX 8034 N 1
SFX 8034 0 ۋېرىدىكەن .

SFX 8035 N 1
SFX 8035 0 رمىسۇن .

SFX 8036 N 1
SFX 8036 0 تىلىرى .

SFX 8037 N 1
SFX 8037 0 دايتتى .

SFX 8038 N 1
SFX 8038 0 ۇقات .

SFX 8039 N 1
SFX 8039 0 ياۋان .

SFX 8040 N 1
SFX 8040 0 لىقىدىنمۇ .

SFX 8041 N 1
SFX 8041 0 پتىمىنا .

SFX 8042 N 1
SFX 8042 0 ىساڭلا .

SFX 8043 N 1
SFX 8043 0 انلارنىڭمۇ .

SFX 8044 N 1
SFX 8044 0 ۈلەتتى .

SFX 8045 N 1
SFX 8045 0 دۈڭ .

SFX 8046 N 1
SFX 8046 0 اھىغا .

SFX 8047 N 1
SFX 8047 0 رۇۋەتتى .

SFX 8048 N 1
SFX 8048 0 ممۇ .

SFX 8049 N 1
SFX 8049 0 ۈردۈڭ .

SFX 8050 N 1
SFX 8050 0 لىۋېتىپتۇ .

SFX 8051 N 1
SFX 8051 0 ىنسى .

SFX 8052 N 1
SFX 8052 0 لىۋەتتى .

SFX 8053 N 1
SFX 8053 0 ىلغاندەك .

SFX 8054 N 1
SFX 8054 0 لەتكەن .

SFX 8055 N 1
SFX 8055 0 باشلانغۇچ .

SFX 8056 N 1
SFX 8056 0 ىگىنىم .

SFX 8057 N 1
SFX 8057 0 ىچىلارغا .

SFX 8058 N 1
SFX 8058 0 لسىڭىز .

SFX 8059 N 1
SFX 8059 0 رغا .

SFX 8060 N 1
SFX 8060 0 يادۇر .

SFX 8061 N 1
SFX 8061 0 نسىمۇ .

SFX 8062 N 1
SFX 8062 0 پتىمەنغۇ .

SFX 8063 N 1
SFX 8063 0 زىدەك .

SFX 8064 N 1
SFX 8064 0 ۈرۈشكە .

SFX 8065 N 1
SFX 8065 0 ملۇق .

SFX 8066 N 1
SFX 8066 0 للىشىپ .

SFX 8067 N 1
SFX 8067 0 راقلارنى .

SFX 8068 N 1
SFX 8068 0 ەرەك .

SFX 8069 N 1
SFX 8069 0 گىچىلا .

SFX 8070 N 1
SFX 8070 0 تورى .

SFX 8071 N 1
SFX 8071 0 ەنلىرىدىن .

SFX 8072 N 1
SFX 8072 0 لەيسەن .

SFX 8073 N 1
SFX 8073 0 ەرسىز .

SFX 8074 N 1
SFX 8074 0 لىشىدە .

SFX 8075 N 1
SFX 8075 0 لىنىشىنىڭ .

SFX 8076 N 1
SFX 8076 0 رمە .

SFX 8077 N 1
SFX 8077 0 كسەن .

SFX 8078 N 1
SFX 8078 0 تىشىنى .

SFX 8079 N 1
SFX 8079 0 ۈشتىكى .

SFX 8080 N 1
SFX 8080 0 ىلىشى .

SFX 8081 N 1
SFX 8081 0 ۇچنى .

SFX 8082 N 1
SFX 8082 0 ەنگىلى .

SFX 8083 N 1
SFX 8083 0 رلاشقا .

SFX 8084 N 1
SFX 8084 0 ەپى .

SFX 8085 N 1
SFX 8085 0 ىچىلارنىڭ .

SFX 8086 N 1
SFX 8086 0 قۇزغان .

SFX 8087 N 1
SFX 8087 0 ىتىلماق .

SFX 8088 N 1
SFX 8088 0 ىپتىمەن .

SFX 8089 N 1
SFX 8089 0 پەرەسلىكى .

SFX 8090 N 1
SFX 8090 0 مىلارنى .

SFX 8091 N 1
SFX 8091 0 گىچە .

SFX 8092 N 1
SFX 8092 0 ىلاردۇر .

SFX 8093 N 1
SFX 8093 0 ازلىقنىڭ .

SFX 8094 N 1
SFX 8094 0 بەگ .

SFX 8095 N 1
SFX 8095 0 الغۇچىلار .

SFX 8096 N 1
SFX 8096 0 نلىقىمدىن .

SFX 8097 N 1
SFX 8097 0 كاچە .

SFX 8098 N 1
SFX 8098 0 شلىرىگە .

SFX 8099 N 1
SFX 8099 0 دىغانلىقىڭنى .

SFX 8100 N 1
SFX 8100 0 لۈكسىز .

SFX 8101 N 1
SFX 8101 0 ەكلە .

SFX 8102 N 1
SFX 8102 0 خوردا .

SFX 8103 N 1
SFX 8103 0 گوچە .

SFX 8104 N 1
SFX 8104 0 شتۇرۇشتىن .

SFX 8105 N 1
SFX 8105 0 پاي .

SFX 8106 N 1
SFX 8106 0 ۇژ .

SFX 8107 N 1
SFX 8107 0 ىدىكەن .

SFX 8108 N 1
SFX 8108 0 اركەن .

SFX 8109 N 1
SFX 8109 0 لگەنلەر .

SFX 8110 N 1
SFX 8110 0 غانلىقىڭىزغا .

SFX 8111 N 1
SFX 8111 0 ۇننى .

SFX 8112 N 1
SFX 8112 0 مىسىدىكى .

SFX 8113 N 1
SFX 8113 0 ىرىدىكى .

SFX 8114 N 1
SFX 8114 0 توپ .

SFX 8115 N 1
SFX 8115 0 شسام .

SFX 8116 N 1
SFX 8116 0 رۇۋېتىدۇ .

SFX 8117 N 1
SFX 8117 0 زملىق .

SFX 8118 N 1
SFX 8118 0 دۈك .

SFX 8119 N 1
SFX 8119 0 رسىيە .

SFX 8120 N 1
SFX 8120 0 لىكىڭىز .

SFX 8121 N 1
SFX 8121 0 تىڭدىن .

SFX 8122 N 1
SFX 8122 0 شىشنى .

SFX 8123 N 1
SFX 8123 0 تولۇق .
